Utah statutes.
73-18-22.   Boating Account created -- Contents -- Use of money.
(1)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as
the Boating Account.
(2)  Except as provided under Sections 73-18-24 and 73-18-25, all registration
fees and related moneys collected by the division or any authorized agent,
less the costs of collecting motorboat and sailboat registration fees by an
authorized agent, shall be deposited into the Boating Account.
(3)  The amount retained by an authorized agent may not exceed 20% of the fees
charged in Section 73-18-7.
(4)  Money in the Boating Account may be used for:
(a)  the construction, improvement, operation, and maintenance of publicly
owned boating facilities;
(b)  boater education; and
(c)  the payment of the costs and expenses of the division in administering
and enforcing this chapter.
